Utah statutes.
78B-3-420.   Proceedings considered a binding arbitration hearing upon
written agreement of parties -- Compensation to members of panel.
Upon written agreement by all parties, the proceeding may be considered a
binding arbitration hearing and proceed under Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah
Uniform Arbitration Act, except for the selection of the panel, which is done
as set forth in Subsection 78B-3-416(4).  If the proceeding is considered an
arbitration proceeding, the parties are equally responsible for compensation
to the members of the panel for services rendered.
